Washington statutes.
RCW 35.38.060

Definition—"Financial institution."

"Financial institution," as used in the foregoing provisions of this chapter, means a branch of a bank engaged in banking in this state in accordance with *RCW 30.04.300, and any state bank or trust company, national banking association, stock savings bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association, which institution is located in this state and lawfully engaged in business.

[ 1984 c 177 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.38.060. Prior: 1907 c 22 s 4; RRS s 5574.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.04.300 was recodified as RCW 30A.04.300 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.